Tennessee, session 114, HB2047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-206(d), is amended by adding
the following language after the first sentence of the subsection:
Certification may be submitted electronically, as appropriate.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2047
011933
- 1 -